Connecticut, session 2026, SB00515.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Augmented productivity" means the portion of gross revenue
that exceeds an employer's three-year historical average, provided such
increase is achieved through the integration of collaborative technology
while maintaining a stable workforce;
(2) "Collaborative technology" means any hardware, software or
algorithmic system, including artificial intelligence, designed to be
operated by or to assist an employee in the performance of such
employee's duties, where the technology serves as a multiplier of the
employee's individual productivity rather than as a stand-alone
replacement of the employee;
(3) "Productivity gap" means the measurable increase in revenue-per-
SB515 / File No. 700 1

SB515 File No. 700
employee hours that occurs when Connecticut payroll is reduced
materially while gross revenue remains stable or increases; and
(4) "Stable workforce" means a Connecticut-domiciled workforce
where the total headcount and aggregate payroll expenses for such
workforce remain at or above ninety-five per cent of the three-year
historical average of the employer.
(b) (1) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall, in consultation with the Commissioner
of Revenue Services, the Labor Commissioner and the Chief Workforce
Officer, submit an implementation plan to the General Assembly, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to ensure that technological advancements serve to augment worker
capability rather than render it obsolete and productivity gains lead to
a more skilled workforce, by establishing (A) a mechanism to reinvest
capital when business output and labor costs become materially
decoupled, (B) steps to be actively taken by the state to minimize such
decoupling by fostering collaborative productivity models that increase
output without a corresponding decline in the workforce, and (C) a
workforce and productivity gap contribution from employers.
(2) The workforce and productivity gap contribution plan shall
include:
(A) A formula for a surcharge to be assessed annually for each income
or taxable year in which an employer maintains a productivity gap.
Such surcharge shall reflect the financial delta between an employer's
baseline productivity levels and its reduced payroll expenses for the
applicable income or taxable year, and shall be structured to ensure that
efficiency gains realized through the displacement of employees are
recaptured by the state on an ongoing basis to mitigate the resulting
economic impact;
(B) An augmented productivity tax exemption that ensures that any
augmented productivity achieved by an employer is permanently
exempt from taxation by the state;
SB515 / File No. 700 2

SB515 File No. 700
(C) Administrative procedures for the reporting and collection of
such surcharge, based on Connecticut-specific payroll and tax data; and
(D) The establishment of a workforce and economic stability account,
in which the surcharges collected shall be deposited and shall be used
exclusively for the purposes of workforce retraining, technical
education and career transition programs for displaced employees.
(c) If the General Assembly does not enact, prior to July 1, 2027, the
implementation plan submitted pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, notwithstanding the provisions of sections 4-168 to 4-172,
inclusive, of the general statutes, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management shall issue policies and procedures to implement the
provisions of such plan. The secretary shall post such policies and
procedures on said office's Internet web site and submit such policies
and procedures to the Secretary of the State for posting on the
eRegulations System, at least fifteen days prior to the effective date of
such policies and procedures. Any such policies and procedures shall
no longer be effective upon the adoption of such policy or procedure as
a final regulation in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
FIN Joint Favorable
SB515 / File No. 700 3

SB515 File No. 700
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Cost Up to Potential
$300,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost of up to $300,000 to the Office of Policy and
Management (OPM) in FY 27 for a consultant to (1) develop a plan for
technological advancements and productivity gains related to the
workforce, and (2) submit the plan by January 1, 2027. Consultant costs
are dependent on the complexity of the plan as it must meet certain
requirements outlined in the bill.
The bill also results in a potential cost to OPM in FY 28 to the extent
OPM is required to issue policies and procedures to implement this plan
in the instance that the General Assembly does not enact the plan prior
to July 1, 2027.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
SB515 / File No. 700 4

SB515 File No. 700
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 515
AN ACT CONCERNING THE CONNECTICUT WORKFORCE AND A
PRODUCTIVITY GAP SURCHARGE.